Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1360.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1GENERAL PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the So Every BODY Can Move Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 20260SB1360PN1796 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost sharing." The portion of costs paid by an enrollee for a particular benefit covered by a health insurance policy or MA or CHIP managed care plan, including deductibles, coinsurance, copayments or similar charges."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Enrollee." An individual covered under a health insurance policy or MA or CHIP managed care plan."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) An individual or group insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan offered, issued or renewed by a health insurer that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services.(2) The term does not include:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A fixed indemnity policy.(vi) A hospital indemnity policy.(vii) A dental only policy.(viii) A vision only policy.(ix) A workers' compensation policy.(x) An automobile medical payment policy.(xi) A homeowners' insurance policy.(xii) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Health insurer." An entity licensed by the Insurance Department with accident and health authority to issue a health 20260SB1360PN1796 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Medical Assistance or Children's Health Insurance Program managed care plan" or "MA or CHIP managed care plan." A health care plan that uses a gatekeeper to manage the utilization of health care services by medical assistance or children's health insurance program enrollees and integrates the financing and delivery of health care services."Medical Practice Act." The act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985."Medicare fee schedule." The Medicare Durable Medical Equipment, Prosthetics, Orthotics and Supplies Fee Schedule established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services."Provider." An individual licensed as a prosthetist, orthotist, pedorthist or orthotic fitter under section 13.5 of the Medical Practice Act.CHAPTER 3INSURERSSection 301. Coverage for prostheses and orthoses.(a) Amount of coverage.--Each health insurance policy providing coverage for hospital, medical or surgical expenses must include coverage for prosthetic and custom orthotic 20260SB1360PN1796 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 devices, services, materials and components as described in this act that:(1) Equals the coverage and payment provided under Federal laws and regulations for the aged and people with disabilities in accordance with:(i) 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395k (relating to scope of benefits; definitions), 1395l (relating to payment of benefits) and 1395m (relating to special payment rules for particular items and services).(ii) 42 CFR 410.100 (relating to included services), 414.202 (relating to definitions), 414.210 (relating to general payment rules) and 414.228 (relating to prosthetic and orthotic devices).(2) Equals payment at a rate not less than the current quarter's Medicare fee schedule for prosthetic and orthotic items and services in this Commonwealth.(b) Multiple prostheses and orthoses.--Subject to section 303, benefits under this section shall provide coverage for more than one prosthetic or custom orthotic device when medically necessary and shall include coverage for:(1) A prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's provider to be the most appropriate model that adequately meets the medical needs of the enrollee to restore or maintain the ability to perform activities of daily living and essential job-related functions.(2) In addition to coverage described in paragraph (1), a prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's provider to be the most appropriate model that meets the medical needs of the enrollee for the purposes of:(i) performing physical activities, including 20260SB1360PN1796 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 running, biking, swimming and strength training, as applicable; and(ii) maximizing whole-body health, including lower and upper limb function, as applicable.(3) In addition to coverage described in paragraphs (1) and (2), a prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's provider to be the most appropriate model that meets the medical needs of the enrollee for purposes of showering or bathing.(4) Materials and components necessary for use of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3).(5) Instruction to the enrollee on the use of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3).(6) The medically necessary repair or replacement of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3).Section 302. Nature of benefits.Any benefits delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this Commonwealth by a health insurance policy under section 301:(1) Shall also be considered rehabilitative and habilitative services and devices in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 18022(b) (relating to essential health benefits requirements).(2) Shall not constitute an addition to the State's essential health benefits that requires defrayal of costs by the State in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 18031(d)(3)(B) (relating to affordable choices of health benefit plans).20260SB1360PN1796 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 303. Determination and prescription.For covered benefits under section 301(b)(2) or (3), the physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant of the enrollee shall:(1) Determine that, as applicable, the additional prosthetic or custom orthotic device is necessary to meet the medical needs of the enrollee to:(i) perform physical activities or maximize whole-body health, as specified in section 301(b)(2); or(ii) shower or bathe, as specified in section 301(b)(3).(2) Issue a prescription for the additional prosthetic or custom orthotic device in accordance with section 13.5(c) of the Medical Practice Act.Section 304. Nondiscriminatory manner.A health insurer:(1) Shall render utilization review determinations in a nondiscriminatory manner.(2) May not deny coverage for prosthetic or custom orthotic devices solely on the basis of an enrollee's actual or perceived disability.(3) May not deny a prosthetic or orthotic benefit for an enrollee with limb loss or absence that would otherwise be covered for a person without a disability seeking medical or surgical intervention to restore or maintain the ability to perform the same physical activity.Section 305. Notification.(a) Provision.--A health insurer shall supply each enrollee annually and, upon written request, each enrollee or health care provider with the following written notification of the benefits 20260SB1360PN1796 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specified under section 301 and the rights specified under section 304. The information shall be easily understandable by the layperson.(b) Adverse benefit determination.--Following an adverse benefit determination based on medical necessity and prior to any appeal of an adverse benefit determination, a health insurer shall provide an enrollee or enrollee's authorized representative with a denial in writing. The denial shall include clear reasoning and descriptions as to why the standard of medical necessity has not been met.Section 306. Financial requirements.(a) Prohibition.--Any benefits delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this Commonwealth by a health insurance policy under section 301 shall not subject an enrollee to separate financial requirements that are applicable only with respect to that coverage.(b) Cost sharing.--Any cost-sharing requirements imposed by a health insurance policy shall not be more restrictive than the cost-sharing requirements applicable to the health insurance policy's coverage for inpatient physician and surgical services.Section 307. Access to other providers.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a health insurer shall ensure access to at least two distinct providers that are located in this Commonwealth and capable of providing the benefits required under section 301 within their network.(b) Exception.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), nothing in subsection (a) shall:(i) Require a health insurer that has a network of 20260SB1360PN1796 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providers to provide benefits covered under section 301 that are delivered by an out-of-network provider.(ii) Preclude a health insurer that has a network of providers from imposing cost-sharing requirements for care covered under section 301 that is delivered by an out-of-network provider.(2) If a health insurer does not have in its network a provider that can provide care covered under section 301, the health insurer shall cover the care when performed by an out-of-network provider and may not impose cost sharing with respect to the care.Section 308. Replacements.(a) Necessity.--A health insurer shall issue payment for the replacement of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device or for the replacement of any part of the device without regard to continuous use or useful lifetime restrictions if a provider determines that the replacement device, or a replacement of part of the device, is necessary because of any of the following:(1) A change in the physiological condition of the enrollee.(2) An irreparable change in the condition of the device or in a part of the device.(3) The condition of the device, or the part of the device, requires repairs and the cost of the repairs would be more than 60% of the cost of a replacement device or of the part being replaced.(b) Determination and prescription.--A health insurer may require a physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant to confirm a determination made by the provider under subsection (a) and issue a 20260SB1360PN1796 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prescription in accordance with section 13.5(c) of the Medical Practice Act if the prosthetic or custom orthotic device or part being replaced is less than three years old.Section 309. Notice by Insurance Department.(a) Development of notice.--The Insurance Department shall develop a notice that includes all of the following:(1) A summary of the new duties and requirements imposed on health insurers and health insurance policies by this act and the dates by which the new duties and requirements take effect.(2) An estimated timeline of any temporary or permanent rules and regulations that the department may issue, promulgate or adopt as authorized under section 311.(3) Any information or guidance not included in paragraph (1) or (2) that is necessary for a health insurer to comply with the provisions of this act.(b) Posting and distribution of notice.--With respect to the notice under subsection (a), no later than 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Insurance Department shall:(1) Post the notice on its publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Provide the notice to all health insurers subject to this act.Section 310. Reports.(a) Annual reports required.--No later than January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter, each health insurer subject to this chapter shall report to the Insurance Department on its experience in accordance with the requirements of this act for the previous year.20260SB1360PN1796 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Contents.--Each report under subsection (a) must be in a form developed by the Insurance Department and must include the total number of claims and the total amount of claims paid in this Commonwealth for the services required by this act.(c) Aggregation of data.--No later than April 1, 2028, and each April 1 thereafter, the Insurance Department shall aggregate the data under subsection (b) for the previous year into an annual report and shall:(1) Submit the report to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Post the report on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Insurance Department.Section 311. Rules and regulations.(a) Authorization.--The Insurance Department may promulgate or adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this act.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) To facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the Insurance Department may issue temporary regulations. The following shall apply to temporary regulations:(i) The Insurance Department must issue the temporary regulations within six months of the effective date of this subparagraph. Regulations adopted after this six-month period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(ii) Notice of the temporary regulations shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20260SB1360PN1796 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The Insurance Department shall post its temporary regulations on its publicly accessible Internet website.(iv) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the Insurance Department shall propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute.Section 312. Enforcement.The Insurance Department shall enforce the provisions of this chapter for health insurers in accordance with the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.CHAPTER 5GOVERNMENT PROGRAMSSection 501. Coverage for prostheses and orthoses.20260SB1360PN1796 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Amount of coverage.--MA and CHIP managed care plans providing coverage for hospital, medical or surgical expenses must include coverage for prosthetic and custom orthotic devices, services, materials and components as described in this act that:(1) Equals the coverage and payment provided under Federal laws and regulations for the aged and people with disabilities in accordance with:(i) 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395k (relating to scope of benefits; definitions), 1395l (relating to payment of benefits) and 1395m (relating to special payment rules for particular items and services).(ii) 42 CFR 410.100 (relating to included services), 414.202 (relating to definitions), 414.210 (relating to general payment rules) and 414.228 (relating to prosthetic and orthotic devices).(2) Equals payment at a rate not less than the current quarter's Medicare fee schedule for prosthetic and orthotic items and services in this Commonwealth.(b) Update.--The department shall update the medical assistance fee-for-service program to include all codes for prosthetic and custom orthotic devices and services listed in the current quarter's Medicare fee schedule.(c) Multiple prostheses and orthoses.--Subject to section 503, benefits under this section shall provide coverage for more than one prosthetic or custom orthotic device when medically necessary and shall include coverage for:(1) A prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's provider to be the most appropriate model that adequately meets the medical needs of the enrollee to restore 20260SB1360PN1796 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or maintain the ability to perform activities of daily living and essential job-related functions.(2) In addition to coverage described in paragraph (1), a prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's provider to be the most appropriate model that meets the medical needs of the enrollee for the purposes of:(i) performing physical activities, including running, biking, swimming and strength training, as applicable; and(ii) maximizing whole-body health, including lower and upper limb function, as applicable.(3) In addition to coverage described in paragraphs (1) and (2), a prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's provider to be the most appropriate model that meets the medical needs of the enrollee for purposes of showering or bathing.(4) All materials and components necessary for use of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3).(5) Instruction to the enrollee on the use of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3).(6) The medically necessary repair or replacement of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device described in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3).Section 502. Nature of benefits.Any benefits delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this Commonwealth by an MA and CHIP managed care plan under section 501:(1) Shall also be considered rehabilitative and 20260SB1360PN1796 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 habilitative services and devices in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 18022(b) (relating to essential health benefits requirements).(2) Shall not constitute an addition to the State's essential health benefits that requires defrayal of costs by the State in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 18031(d)(3)(B) (relating to affordable choices of health benefit plans).Section 503. Determination and prescription.For covered benefits under section 501(c)(2) or (3), the physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant of the enrollee shall:(1) Determine that, as applicable, the additional prosthetic or custom orthotic device is necessary to meet the medical needs of the enrollee to:(i) perform physical activities or maximize whole-body health, as specified in section 501(c)(2); or(ii) shower or bathe, as specified in section 501(c)(3).(2) Issue a prescription for the additional prosthetic or custom orthotic device in accordance with section 13.5(c) of the Medical Practice Act.Section 504. Nondiscriminatory manner.An MA and CHIP managed care plan:(1) Shall render utilization review determinations in a nondiscriminatory manner.(2) May not deny coverage for prosthetic or custom orthotic devices solely on the basis of an enrollee's actual or perceived disability.(3) May not deny a prosthetic or orthotic benefit for an enrollee with limb loss or absence that would otherwise be 20260SB1360PN1796 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 covered for a person without a disability seeking medical or surgical intervention to restore or maintain the ability to perform the same physical activity.Section 505. Notification.(a) Provision.--An MA and CHIP managed care plan shall supply each enrollee annually and, upon written request, each enrollee or health care provider with the following written notification of the benefits specified under section 501 and the rights specified under section 504. The information shall be easily understandable by the layperson.(b) Adverse benefit determination.--Following an adverse benefit determination based on medical necessity and prior to any appeal of an adverse benefit determination, an MA and CHIP managed care plan shall provide an enrollee or enrollee's authorized representative with a denial in writing. The denial shall include clear reasoning and descriptions as to why the standard of medical necessity has not been met.Section 506. Financial requirements.(a) Prohibition.--Any benefits delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this Commonwealth by an MA and CHIP managed care plan under section 501 shall not subject an enrollee to separate financial requirements that are applicable only with respect to that coverage.(b) Cost sharing.--Any cost-sharing requirements imposed by an MA and CHIP managed care plan shall not be more restrictive than the cost-sharing requirements applicable to the MA and CHIP managed care plan's coverage for inpatient physician and surgical services.Section 507. Access to other providers.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), an 20260SB1360PN1796 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MA and CHIP managed care plan shall ensure access to at least two distinct providers that are located in this Commonwealth and capable of providing the benefits required under section 501 within their network.(b) Exception.--(1) (i) Subject to paragraph (2), nothing in subsection (a) shall:(A) Require an MA and CHIP managed care plan that has a network of providers to provide benefits covered under section 501 that are delivered by an out-of-network provider.(B) Preclude an MA and CHIP managed care plan that has a network of providers from imposing cost-sharing requirements for care covered under section 501 that is delivered by an out-of-network provider.(ii) If an MA and CHIP managed care plan does not have in its network a provider that can provide care covered under section 501, the MA and CHIP managed care plan shall cover the care when performed by an out-of-network provider and may not impose cost sharing with respect to the care.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting an enrollee's ability to receive care under section 501 from a health care provider in accordance with 42 CFR 431.51 (relating to free choice of providers).Section 508. Replacements.(a) Necessity.--An MA and CHIP managed care plan shall issue payment for the replacement of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device or for the replacement of any part of the device without regard to continuous use or useful lifetime restrictions if a 20260SB1360PN1796 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provider determines that the replacement device, or a replacement of part of the device, is necessary because of any of the following:(1) A change in the physiological condition of the enrollee.(2) An irreparable change in the condition of the device or in a part of the device.(3) The condition of the device, or the part of the device, requires repairs and the cost of the repairs would be more than 60% of the cost of a replacement device or of the part being replaced.(b) Determination and prescription.--An MA and CHIP managed care plan may require a physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant to confirm a determination made by the provider under subsection (a) and issue a prescription in accordance with section 13.5(c) of the Medical Practice Act if the prosthetic or custom orthotic device or part being replaced is less than three years old.Section 509. Notice by department.(a) Development of notice.--The department shall develop a notice that includes all of the following:(1) A summary of the new duties and requirements imposed on an MA or CHIP managed care plan by this act and the dates by which the new duties and requirements take effect.(2) An estimated timeline of any temporary or permanent rules and regulations that the department may issue, promulgate or adopt as authorized under section 511.(3) Any information or guidance not included in paragraph (1) or (2) that is necessary for an MA or CHIP managed care plan or any other organization subject to the 20260SB1360PN1796 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department's enforcement authority under this act to comply with the provisions of this act.(b) Posting and distribution of notice.--With respect to the notice under subsection (a), no later than 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall:(1) Post the notice on its publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Provide the notice to each MA or CHIP managed care plan that is a party to a managed care contract with the department and any other organizations subject to the department's enforcement authority under this act.Section 510. Reports.(a) Annual reports required.--No later than January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter, each MA or CHIP managed care plan subject to this act shall report to the department on its experience in accordance with the requirements of this act for the previous year.(b) Contents.--Each report under subsection (a) must be in a form developed by the department and must include the total number of claims and the total amount of claims paid in this Commonwealth for the services required by this act.(c) Aggregation of data.--No later than April 1, 2028, and each April 1 thereafter, the department shall aggregate the data under subsection (b) for the previous year into an annual report and shall:(1) Submit the report to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Post the report on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.20260SB1360PN1796 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 511. Rules and regulations.(a) Authorization.--The department may promulgate or adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this act.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) To facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the department may issue temporary regulations. The following shall apply to temporary regulations:(i) The department must issue the temporary regulations within six months of the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this six-month period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(ii) Notice of the temporary regulations shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(iii) The department shall post its temporary regulations on its publicly accessible Internet website.(iv) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of 20260SB1360PN1796 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the department shall propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute.Section 512. Enforcement.The department shall enforce this act by:(1) Following the complaint procedures under 55 Pa. Code § 107.4(c) (relating to procedures to assure nondiscrimination of participating agencies, institutions, organizations and vendors) for complaints arising under this act.(2) Ensuring that providers receiving medical assistance payments are not engaged in activities prohibited by 55 Pa. Code § 1101.75 (relating to provider prohibited acts).CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Limit benefits otherwise available to an enrollee under a health insurance policy or MA or CHIP managed care plan.(2) Supersede the provisions of the Medical Practice Act or section 443.6 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.Section 702. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates 20260SB1360PN1796 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 703. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1360PN1796 - 22 - 1234567891011